Tennessee, session 114, SB2646.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-53-103, is amended by designating
the existing section as subsection (b) and adding the following new subsection (a):
(a) If necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes and provisions of this
chapter, the board of directors of the corporation may initiate a merger with another
corporation in the manner provided for public benefit corporations pursuant to title 48,
chapter 61.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2646
011548
- 1 -